Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
10H

LONG-TERM
CARE INSURANCE

Note

See table at end of this Article for derivation of HRS
sections from the National Association of Insurance Commissioners 1998 Model
Act or Regulations.

Cross References

Long-term care financing, see chapter 346C.

PART I.
LONG-TERM CARE INSURANCE MODEL ACT

[§431:10H-101] Purpose. The purpose of
this article is to promote the public interest, to promote the availability of
long-term care insurance policies, to protect applicants for long-term care
insurance, as defined, from unfair or deceptive sales or enrollment practices,
to establish standards for long-term care insurance, to facilitate public
understanding and comparison of long-term care insurance policies, and to
facilitate flexibility and innovation in the development of long-term care
insurance coverage. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next